Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 6
STUDY OF SELF-SUFFICIENCY TRUSTS

27-10.5-601. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part repealed, p. 563, § 24, effective April 24.

Editor's note:

This part 6 was added in 1991. For amendments to this part 6 prior to its repeal in 1996, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.